Hawaii, session 2025, GM1146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that existing state law
recognizes the beneficial use of cannabis in treating certain
debilitating medical conditions, their symptoms, and certain
side effects of treatment of these conditions, including severe
pain, nausea, muscle spasms, and seizures. Act 241, Session
Laws of Hawaii 2015 (Act 241), provided patient access to
medical cannabis beyond the access that existed before the
creation of the dispensary system authorized by Act 241.
However, the intent of the legislature as expressed in Act 241
was, and continues to be, to expand qualifying patients' access
to cannabis rather than to replace existing access routes.
According to the rapid survey of Hawaii medical cannabis
patients and providers conducted by the department of health in
2022, fifty-five per cent of patients indicated that they
obtained their cannabis exclusively from a licensed medical
cannabis dispensary. This means that up to forty-five per cent
of patients obtain their cannabis for medical use from other
2025-2765 SB1429 GDI SMA-3.docx 1

Page 2 S.B. NO.
-2
C.D. 1
sources, including cultivation. Part of the justification for
establishing the medical cannabis dispensary system was that
some patients may not be able to grow their own supply of
medical cannabis due to certain limitations, such as disability
or lack of space. These patients should continue to have
multiple options for obtaining medical cannabis, including
having a primary caregiver grow an adequate supply of cannabis
for medical use on their behalf.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to maintain and
clarify the multiple options currently available for qualifying
patients to access a safe and legal supply of medical cannabis.
SECTION 2. Chapter 329, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to part IX to be appropriately
designated and to read as follows:
IS "§329- Violations; penalties. (a) In addition to any
other penalties allowed by law, any person who violates this
part or rules adopted pursuant to this part shall be fined not
more than $5,000 for each separate violation. Each day on which
a violation occurs or continues shall constitute a separate
offense.
2025-2765 SB1429 CDl SMA-3.docx 2

Page 3
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(b) The department of health may impose an administrative
penalty on a person pursuant to subsection (a) or rules adopted
pursuant to this part. The department of health shall serve the
person with written notice of the administrative penalty and the
basis for the administrative penalty. Any notice of an
administrative penalty may be accompanied by a cease and desist
order or order for corrective action, or both. The
administrative penalty, cease and desist order, and order for
corrective action shall become final twenty calendar days after
the date of the written notice, unless a contested case hearing
is requested pursuant to subsection (c). The violation of the
cease and desist order or order for corrective action shall
constitute a further violation of this part.
(c) Any person aggrieved by the imposition of an
administrative penalty, cease and desist order, or order for
corrective action may request a contested case hearing pursuant
to chapter 91. To request a contested case hearing, the person
shall submit a written request to the department of health
within twenty calendar days of the date of the written notice.
Appeal to the circuit court under section 91-14 or any other
2025-2765 SB1429 GDI SMA-3.docx 3

Page 4 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
applicable statute shall only be taken from the department of
health's final order pursuant to a contested case.
(d) Any action taken to recover, collect, or enforce the
penalty provided for in this section shall be considered a civil
action. For any judicial proceeding to recover or collect an
administrative penalty imposed pursuant to subsection (a) or to
enforce a cease and desist order or order for corrective action
issued pursuant to subsection (b), the department of health may
petition any court of appropriate jurisdiction and need only
show that;
(1) Notice was served upon the person;
(2) A hearing was held, or the time granted for requesting
a hearing has expired without such a request;
(3) The administrative penalty, cease and desist order, or
order for corrective action was imposed on the person;
and
(4) The penalty remains unpaid, or the order was not complied
with."
SECTION 3. Section 329-123, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsection (c) to read as follows:
2025-2765 SB1429 CDl SMA-3.docx 4

Page 5 S.B. NO.
3^2
C.D. 1
"(c) Primary caregivers shall register with the department
of health. [Bvery] Each primary caregiver shall be responsible
for the care of [eftiy—one] not more than five qualifying
[pat-ieftt-] patients at any given time [7—Ufties-s-^fe^^e—ptimeiy
earcgivcr io the-parent-/——or person having legal
custody of more than one minor qualifying patient,—in which case
ttic primary caregiver may bo responsible—for the care of more
t-han—©ne-^ftinei?—qua-tifyiftg-^at4eftt—at—afty—giveft—time-?—provided
that the primary caregiver io the parent,—guardian,—er- person
having -legal custody of all of -the primary caregiver'o
qualifying patlento]. The department of health may permit
registration of up to two primary caregivers for a minor
qualifying patient; provided that both primary caregivers are
the parent, guardian, or person having legal custody of the
minor qualifying patient."
SECTION 4. Section 329-130, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§329-130 Authorized sources of medical cannaOais. (a)
[After December 31,—2024,—a] A qualifying patient shall obtain
medical cannabis or manufactured cannabis products only:
2025-2765 SB1429 CDl SMA-3.docx
liiiiiniiiiHiiiguiiiiiM

Page 6
S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(1) From a dispensary licensed pursuant to chapter 329D;
provided that the cannabis shall be purchased and paid
for at the time of purchase; [er^]
(2) By cultivating cannabis in an amount that does not
exceed an adequate supply for the qualifying
patient[—] pursuant to section 329-122; provided that
each location used to cultivate cannabis shall be used
[fey—He] to cultivate cannabis for not more than five
qualifying patients[—]; or
(3) From the qualifying patient's primary caregiver who
cultivates cannabis in an amount that does not exceed
an adequate supply for the qualifying patient pursuant
to section 329-122; provided that each location used
to cultivate cannabis shall be used to cultivate
cannabis for not more than five qualifying patients.
[After—Deccmbor 31,—2-0^4-7—no primary carogivor shall be
authorizod to cultivate cannabis for any qualifying patient.
- [fe^-- This section shall not apply-to:
- Hd- A qualifying patient-who is a minor or an adult
lacking legal—capacity and the primar-y caregiver is
2025-2765 SB1429 GDI SMA-3.docx 6
illMlllillllilllBlGIIIH'Itilllii

Page 7 S.B. NO. 1429
S.D. 2
H.D. 3
CD. 1
the parent,—guardian,—or poroon having Icgal-cuotody
of a qualifyin-g patient descr4bed in-the paragraph-;—or
- (-2^ A qualifying pat-ie-nt- on any island on- which there io
no medical ca-nnabis -dlroponoary licensed pursuant to
chapter 329D.
- fe)-] (b) A qualifying out-of-state patient and a caregiver
of a qualifying out-of-state patient shall be authorized to
obtain cannabis for medical use only from retail dispensing
locations of dispensaries licensed pursuant to chapter 329D."
SECTION 5. Section 329D-27, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by amending subsections (b) and (c) to read as follows:
"(b) No later than January 4, 2016, the department shall
adopt interim rules, which shall be exempt from chapter 91 and
chapter 201M, to effectuate the purposes of this chapter;
provided that the interim rules shall remain in effect until
July 1, [202^] 2027, or until rules are adopted pursuant to
subsection (a), whichever occurs sooner.
(c) The department may amend the interim rules, and the
amendments shall be exempt from chapters 91 and 201M, to
effectuate the purposes of this chapter; provided that any
amended interim rules shall remain in effect until July 1,
2025-2765 SB1429 CDl SMA-3.docx 7

Page 8 S.B. NO.
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
[20257-] 2027, or until rules are adopted pursuant to subsection
(a), whichever occurs sooner."
SECTION 6. Act 241, Session Laws of Hawaii 2015,
section 14, as amended by Act 41, Session Laws of Hawaii 2017,
section 11, as amended by Act 159, Session Laws of Hawaii 2018,
section 4, is amended to read as follows:
"SECTION 14. For the purposes of effectuating this Act,
the personnel hired and the contracts entered into by the
department of health, pursuant to this Act, shall be exempt from
chapter 76, Hawaii Revised Statutes, for a period beginning on
July 1, 2015, and ending on June 30, [-2^2-5-^] 2^22/. provided
that:
(1) All personnel actions taken pursuant to this Act by
the department of health after June 30, [2025,] 2029,
shall be subject to chapter 76, Hawaii Revised
Statutes, as appropriate; and
(2) Any employee hired by the department of health to
effectuate this Act, who occupies a position exempt
from civil service on July 1, [2025,] 2029, shall:
(A) Be appointed to a civil service position; and
2025-2765 SB1429 CDl SMA-3.docx 8

Page 9 S.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(B) Not suffer any loss of prior service credit,
vacation or sick leave credits previously earned,
or other employee benefits or privileges;
provided that the employee possesses the minimum
qualifications and public employment requirements for
the class or position to which appointed; provided
further that subsequent changes in status shall be
made pursuant to applicable civil service and
compensation laws."
SECTION 7. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 8. This Act shall take effect upon its approval;
provided that sections 3 and 4 shall take effect retroactive to
January 1, 2025.
2025-2765 SB1429 CDl SMA-3.docx 9
IIIHIMHIliaiHIIIIINillMH

S.B. NO.
H.D. 3
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 14th day of May , 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAI‘1

S.B. No. 1429, S.D. 2, H.D. 3, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 1429, SD 2, HD 3, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives